Maine, session 132, LD2040.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 7 MRSA §2, sub-§6, as amended by PL 2025, c. 309, §§2 to 4, is further
amended by enacting at the end a new last blocked paragraph to read:
The commissioner shall, with the input of the advisory committee and in partnership with
outside agencies or other state agencies as necessary, institute an annual survey and
regularly publish a report regarding food insecurity in the State. The survey may include
measurements of disparities of food insecurity in social subgroups, including those defined
by age, geography, income, race and veteran status.